Hawaii statutes.
§392-21.5 Proceedings to determine
employment and coverage. The director of labor and industrial relations
shall have original jurisdiction over all controversies and disputes over
employment and coverage under this chapter. Except in cases where services are
specifically and expressly excluded from "employment" under section
392-5, it shall be presumed that coverage applies unless the party seeking
exclusion is able to establish under both the control test and the relative
nature of the work test that coverage is not appropriate under this chapter.
There shall be a right of appeal from decisions of the director to the circuit
court and thence to the intermediate appellate court, subject to chapter 602.
[L 1996, c 94, §2; am L 2004, c 202, §46; am L 2006, c 94, §1; am L 2010, c
109, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next